Arkansas, session 2025, HB1679.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 17, Subchapter 12, is
amended to add additional sections to read as follows:
20-17-1228. Rights of next of kin to modify, amend, or revoke
anatomical gift.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter to the
contrary, a donor’s prior anatomical gift may be modified, amended, or
revoked before the donor’s death by an agent acting pursuant to the donor’s
durable power of attorney for health care, unless the power of attorney for
health care or other record prohibits the agent from modifying, amending, or
*JMB312*
04-09-2025 14:53:08 JMB312

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 S4/8/25 S4/9/25 HB1679
revoking an anatomical gift.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter to the
contrary, following the irreversible cessation of circulatory and respiratory
functions of a donor, if the death is pronounced in a place other than a
medical facility, or two (2) hours after the pronouncement of cardiac or
asystolic death within a medical facility, a donor’s prior anatomical gift
may be modified, amended, or revoked by the following:
(1) First, the spouse of the donor;
(2) Second, the sole child of the donor or, if there is more
than one (1) child of the donor, the majority of the surviving children;
(3)(A) Third, the surviving parent or parents of the donor.
(B) If one (1) of the parents of the donor is absent, the
remaining parent shall be vested with the rights and duties of this section
after reasonable efforts have been unsuccessful in locating the absent
parent;
(4) Fourth, the surviving brother or sister of the donor or, if
there is more than one (1) sibling of the donor, the majority of the
surviving siblings;
(5) Fifth, the surviving grandparent of the donor or, if there
is more than one (1) surviving grandparent, the majority of the grandparents;
(6) Sixth, the surviving grandchild of the donor or, if there is
more than one (1) surviving grandchild, the majority of the grandchildren;
(7) Seventh, the guardian of the donor at the time of the
donor's death, if one had been appointed; or
(8) Eighth, the person in the classes of the next degree of
kinship, in descending order, under the laws of descent and distribution to
inherit the estate of the donor.
(c)(1) Within each class, less than the majority of the class shall be
vested with the rights of this section if they have used reasonable efforts
to notify all other members of the class of their instructions and are not
aware of any opposition to those instructions on the part of more than one-
half (½) of all surviving children.
(2) As used in this section, “class” means surviving children,
siblings, grandparents, or grandchildren, where applicable.
(d)(1) A person entitled under this section to modify, amend, or
revoke a donor’s anatomical gift shall forfeit that right, with the right
04-09-2025 14:53:08 JMB312

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 S4/8/25 S4/9/25 HB1679
passing to the next qualifying person as listed in this section, in the
following circumstances:
(A)(i) Any person charged with capital murder, § 5-10-101,
murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102, murder in the second degree, § 5-10-
103, or manslaughter, § 5-10-104, in connection with the donor’s death.
(ii) If the charges against such person are
terminated by an acquittal, dismissal, or nolle prosequi, the right to
modify, amend, or revoke a donor’s anatomical gift is returned to the person;
(B)(i) When the person entitled to modify, amend, or
revoke a donor’s anatomical gift under this section and the donor were
estranged at the time of the donor’s incapacity or death.
(ii) As used in this section, “estranged” means a
physical and emotional separation from the donor at the time of incapacity or
death that has existed for a period of time that clearly demonstrates an
absence of due affection, trust, and regard for the donor, including the
filing of a complaint for divorce by either party that remains pending at the
time of the donor's incapacity or death or the separation by living apart of
the donor and spouse for a period of more than ninety (90) days preceding the
donor's incapacity or death.
(2) If there is a dispute between those sharing the right to
modify, amend, or revoke an incapacitated donor’s anatomical gift, the
donor’s anatomical gift may not be modified, revoked, or amended.
(e) The decision to modify, amend, or revoke a donor’s anatomical gift
under this section may be made orally or in a written record.
(f) A hospital, clinic, physician, healthcare provider, funeral
director, or funeral home acting in accordance with this section, or
attempting in good faith to do so, is not liable for the act in a civil
action, criminal prosecution, or administrative proceeding.
(g) If anything in this section conflicts with federal law or
regulation, the federal law or regulation shall prevail.

20-17-1229. Reporting of organ procurement organization.
(a)(1) On or before January 31 of every year, an organ procurement
organization that procures or recovers organs or tissues in this state shall
submit a written report to the Legislative Council for the organ procurement
organization's most recent fiscal year.
04-09-2025 14:53:08 JMB312

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 S4/8/25 S4/9/25 HB1679
(2) The report described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall
contain:
(A)(i) The number and types of organs and tissues
recovered by the organ procurement organization within this state during the
reporting period, together with a breakdown of the number of organs that were
donated by persons who had consented to donation prior to death and the
number of organs that were donated under § 20-17-1209.
(ii) The organ procurement organization shall break down the number
and types of organs and tissues reported under subdivision (a)(2)(A)(i) of
this section by the number and types of organs and tissues which were used
for:
(a) Transplantation;
(b) Research;
(c) Education; and
(d) Any other purpose;
(B) The names of each organization to whom organs or
tissues were furnished by the organ procurement organization;
(C)(i) The total moneys paid to the organ procurement
organization in connection with all organs or tissues recovered or procured
by the organ procurement organization during the reporting period.
(ii) The organ procurement organization shall break
down the moneys paid to the organ procurement organization reported under
subdivision (a)(2)(C)(i) of this section by the category of moneys earned
from organs or tissues recovered or procured for:
(a) Transplantation;
(b) Research;
(c) Education; and
(d) Any other purpose;
(E) The number of instances in which the revocation of any
anatomical gift under § 20-17-1228(a) was communicated to the organ
procurement organization; and
(F) The number of instances in which the revocation of any
anatomical gift under § 20-17-1228(b) was communicated to the organ
procurement organization.
(b) The report under this section shall be presented by an executive
of the private procurement organization who shall be available to answer
04-09-2025 14:53:08 JMB312

As Engrossed: H3/19/25 S4/8/25 S4/9/25 HB1679
questions of the Legislative Council unless excused or waived by the
Legislative Council.
(c) A private procurement organization that fails to timely report
pursuant to this section shall have its charter revoked by the Secretary of
State and shall be barred from engaging in organ procurement within this
state.
(d) The Secretary of State shall revoke the charter of an organ
procurement organization that fails to timely report under this section.

/s/M. Brown


























04-09-2025 14:53:08 JMB312